Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin YOUTHPRISE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Youthprise to provide economic development services designed to enhance long-term economic self-sufficiency in communities statewide with concentrated populations from the African diaspora. At least 50 percent of grant money must be used for subgrants to organizations serving communities located outside the seven-county metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end